Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-806
Secretary of State; authorized copies; distribution.

Duly authorized copies of sections 83-801 to 83-806 shall, upon their approval be transmitted by the Secretary of State to the Governor of each state, the Attorney General and the Administrator of General Services of the United States, and the Council of State Governments.

Laws 1969, c. 556, § 6, p. 2272.